Utah statutes.
26-23-8.   Representatives of department authorized to enter regulated
premises.
Authorized representatives of the department upon presentation of appropriate
identification shall be authorized to enter upon the premises of properties
regulated under this title to perform routine inspections to insure compliance
with rules adopted by the department.  This section does not authorize the
department to inspect private dwellings.
